Indiana, session 2026, HB1372.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 28. Commercial Property Services Contracts
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "automatic renewal clause"
means a provision in a commercial property services contract that
provides for the automatic renewal of the contract unless the
property owner gives notice to the service provider that the
property owner intends to terminate the contract at the end of the
contract term.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "commercial property"
means a parcel of real estate that is located in Indiana and used for
commercial purposes.
(b) The term does not include the following:
(1) Real estate assessed as agricultural or industrial property
for property tax purposes.
(2) Real estate containing one (1) to four (4) residential units.
2026 IN 1372—LS 6991/DI 101


(3) Single family residential units such as:
(A) condominiums;
(B) townhouses;
(C) manufactured homes; or
(D) homes in a subdivision;
when sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit
basis, even if those units are part of a larger building or parcel
or are located on real estate containing more than four (4)
residential units.
Sec. 3. (a) As used in this chapter, "commercial property
services contract" means a contract that:
(1) is initially entered into by a service provider and a
property owner after June 30, 2026; and
(2) provides for the provision of:
(A) services; and
(B) any personal property related to providing, or
necessary to provide, those services;
with respect to the property owner's commercial property.
(b) The term includes a contract for:
(1) private waste hauling or removal services;
(2) security or alarm services;
(3) services involving fire prevention or suppression systems,
including any related inspection or maintenance services;
(4) document shredding services;
(5) landscaping or irrigation services;
(6) cleaning or sanitation services; or
(7) other similar services;
used in a commercial operation.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "person" means an individual, a
partnership, a limited liability company, a corporation, an
association, or any other legal entity.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "property owner" means a
person that:
(1) owns, controls, or manages commercial property; and
(2) is authorized to enter into a commercial property services
contract with respect to the commercial property.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "service provider" means a
person that agrees to provide:
(1) services; and
(2) any personal property related to providing, or necessary
to provide, those services;
with respect to commercial property, under a commercial property
2026 IN 1372—LS 6991/DI 101


services contract.
Sec. 7. (a) An automatic renewal clause that is included in a
commercial property services contract:
(1) may not provide for a renewal term that is longer than
twelve (12) months in duration, regardless of the duration of
the initial term of the commercial property services contract;
and
(2) must specify a time frame during which the property
owner may give notice to the service provider of the property
owner's intent to terminate:
(A) the contract; or
(B) any subsequent renewal of the contract under the
automatic renewal clause or otherwise;
at the end of the contract term or renewal term, as applicable.
(b) The time frame described in subsection (a)(2) during which
the property owner may give notice of the property owner's intent
to terminate the contract or any subsequent renewal of the
contract must:
(1) begin at least one hundred twenty (120) days before; and
(2) end not later than thirty (30) days before;
the expiration of the contract term or renewal term, as applicable.
(c) An automatic renewal clause that:
(1) is included in a commercial property services contract;
and
(2) does not conform to the requirements set forth in this
section;
is void and may not be enforced.
Sec. 8. A service provider that does not comply with the
requirements set forth in section 7 of this chapter commits a
deceptive act that is actionable by the attorney general and the
property owner under IC 24-5-0.5 and is subject to the remedies
and penalties under IC 24-5-0.5.
2026 IN 1372—LS 6991/DI 101